Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1305.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 8143. Dementia care training.(a) Training requirements.--An EMS provider shall successfully complete an initial training and continuing education on care for individuals with Alzheimer's disease or other dementias as provided under this section.(b) Duties of department.--The department shall develop a dementia training program in cooperation with the Department of Aging and shall include instruction on identifying and interacting with individuals with Alzheimer's disease or other dementias, best practices on emergency medical care for individuals with Alzheimer's disease or other dementias and 123456789101112131415161718 identifying signs of elder abuse.(c) Initial training.--An EMS provider shall complete an initial training during the certification process for EMS providers. The initial training shall be for a minimum of three hours and cover:(1) Dementia, psychiatric and behavioral symptoms and common medical emergencies experienced by individuals living with dementia.(2) Communication issues, including how to communicate respectfully and effectively with an individual who has dementia in order to determine the most appropriate response and effective communication techniques to enhance collaboration with caregivers.(3) How to address behavioral symptoms during the administration of emergency medical treatment.(4) Identifying and reporting incidents of abuse, neglect and exploitation.(5) Protocols for contacting caregivers when an individual with dementia is found wandering or during emergency or crisis situations.(6) Local caregiving resources that are available for individuals living with dementia.(d) Continuing education.--An EMS provider shall annually complete one hour of continuing education on dementia covering the subjects under subsection (c).(e) Certification sanctions.--An EMS provider who has not successfully completed the training required under this section shall be subject to section 8121 (relating to certification sanctions).(f) Waiver of initial training.--20260SB1305PN1659 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) An EMS provider who successfully completes a form of dementia training, as determined by the department, within 18 months prior to the effective date of this paragraph shall be deemed to have satisfied the initial training requirement and shall not be required to repeat the initial training under subsection (c) as a condition of certification or recertification.(2) The department shall establish procedures for EMS providers to satisfy paragraph (1), including acceptable forms of documentation evidencing prior training completion.(3) An EMS provider granted a waiver under this subsection shall be required to complete continuing education under subsection (d).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1305PN1659 - 3 - 1234567891011121314